Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 3 Termination of Guardianship

29-2-30.
Circumstances when guardianship terminates; delivery of property.

The guardianship of a minor shall terminate on the date upon which the earliest of the following occurs: the minor reaches age 18, the minor is adopted, the minor is emancipated, the minor dies, or a court order terminating the guardianship is entered. Proof of adoption, death, or emancipation shall be filed with the court and the court in its discretion may order a hearing.

Within six months prior to the date the minor reaches 18 years of age, the guardian or any other interested person may file a petition for the appointment of a guardian for the minor when that minor becomes an adult, in accordance with the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 4 of this title, to take effect on or after the date the minor reaches 18 years of age.

The death of the minor automatically terminates the guardianship, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 29-2-31.

Upon termination of the guardianship, the guardian shall deliver any money or property to the former minor or, if a guardian or conservator has been appointed for the former minor, to that guardian or conservator or, if the minor is deceased, to the minor’s personal representative.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 4/SB 534.

29-2-31.
Petition for order dismissing guardian.

Upon the termination of the guardianship or the resignation of the guardian, the guardian may petition the court for an order dismissing the guardian from office. The petition shall include a final status report to the court which covers the period of time from the latest annual status report filed by the guardian. The final status report shall contain the information required for annual status reports and shall otherwise comply with the provisions of paragraph (8) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-2-21. Notice shall be published one time in the newspaper in which sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county in which the petition is filed and shall state that any objection must be made in writing and shall designate the date on or before which objections must be filed in the court, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of publication. The court shall examine any objections filed.

If no objection is filed or if, upon hearing any objection, the court is satisfied that the order dismissing the guardian from office is appropriate, the court shall enter an order dismissing the guardian from office. Such order shall not bar an action against the guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.